Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4043.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
There is hereby appropriated to the Oklahoma Department of
Emergency Management from any monies not otherwise appropriated from
the General Revenue Fund of the State Treasury for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2027, the sum of One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00)
or so much thereof as may be necessary to perform the duties imposed
upon the Oklahoma Department of Emergency Management by law.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
Funds appropriated by Section 1 of this act shall be utilized as
follows:

One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) to be transferred to the
Oklahoma Task Force 1 Revolving Fund created by Enrolled House Bill
No. 3831 of the 2nd Session of the 60th Oklahoma Legislature.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4043 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 14th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 16th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 4043 Page 3